Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.70
Temporary housing units; powers of local governments.

Any local government of this state is expressly authorized to acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for installation of temporary housing units for disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency victims and to enter into whatever arrangements are necessary to prepare or equip such sites to utilize the housing units.

Laws 1975, LB 612, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 46.